Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Article 3. Emergency Calls on Party Lines.

Sec. 42.20.120.
Refusal to yield to emergency calls; penalties.

A person who wilfully refuses to yield or surrender the use of a party line to another person for the purpose of permitting the other person to report a fire or summon police, medical, or other aid in case of emergency, is guilty of a misdemeanor and is punishable by a fine of not less than $50 nor more than $500, or by imprisonment for not more than 30 days, or by both.

History.

(§ 2 ch 102 SLA 1957)

Sec. 42.20.130.
Pretext of emergency.

A person who asks for or requests the use of a party line on pretext that an emergency exists, knowing that no emergency in fact exists, is guilty of a misdemeanor and is punishable by a fine of not less than $50 nor more than $500 or by imprisonment for not more than 30 days, or by both.

History.

(§ 3 ch 102 SLA 1957)

Sec. 42.20.140.
Publication in telephone directory.

Every telephone directory published for distribution to the members of the general public must contain a notice that explains AS

42.20.120

—

42.20.150

.
The notice must be printed in type that is no smaller than any other type on the same page and must be preceded by the word “warning.”
This section does not apply to directories distributed solely for business advertising purposes, commonly known as classified directories.

History.

(§ 4 ch 102 SLA 1957)

Sec. 42.20.150.
Definitions.

In AS

42.20.120

—

42.20.150

,

“emergency” means a situation in which property or human life is in jeopardy and the prompt summoning of aid is essential;

“party line” means a subscriber’s line telephone circuit, consisting of two or more main telephone stations connected with it, each station with a distinctive ring or telephone number.

History.

(§ 1 ch 102 SLA 1957)